District of Columbia statutes.
44-1404

Severability.

The invalidity of any part of this chapter shall not be construed to affect the validity of any other part capable of having practical operation and effect without the invalid part.

Mar. 3, 1925, 43 Stat. 1141, ch. 460, § 28
1981 Ed., § 32-804.
1973 Ed., § 32-629.